Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-732
Department of Revenue, Attorney General, and Nebraska State Patrol; duties.

With funds appropriated for such purposes, the department, the Attorney General, and the Nebraska State Patrol shall each dedicate staff personnel and associated costs for the training of personnel and the review, development, enforcement, and prosecution of the motor fuel laws and the penalties associated with the failure to completely comply with the motor fuel laws, rules, and regulations.

It is the intent of this Legislature that the activities of the department, the Attorney General, and the Nebraska State Patrol be coordinated with activities of each other and all other local, state, and federal agencies involved with the development and enforcement of related laws, rules, and regulations.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 127;

Laws 1992, LB 1013, § 18.